Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1313
Nebraska Educational Telecommunications
Commission; creation; purpose.

The Nebraska Educational Telecommunications
Act creates the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission for the
purpose of (1) promoting and establishing noncommercial educational telecommunications
facilities within the State of Nebraska, (2) providing noncommercial educational
telecommunications programs throughout the State of Nebraska by digital broadcast, by closed-circuit transmission, by Internet-based delivery, or
by other telecommunications technology distribution systems, and (3) operating
statewide educational and public radio and television networks, facilities, and services. The commission shall
seek funding from federal, state, foundation, and private sources for capital
construction and annual operations.

Laws 1963, c. 468, § 1, p. 1497;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 461, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2101;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 969;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 50;

Laws 2014, LB692, § 2.